Utah statutes.
58-56-12.   Factory built housing units.

(1) (a)  Manufactured homes constructed, sold, or set-up in the state shall be constructed in accordance with the HUD code.

(b)  Manufactured homes set-up in the state shall be installed in accordance with the state construction code applicable to manufactured housing installation.

(c)  The authority and responsibility for the issuance of building permits for the modification or set-up of manufactured homes within a political subdivision of the state shall be with the local regulator within that political subdivision.

(d)  The inspection of modifications to or the set-up of manufactured homes shall be conducted and approvals given by the local regulator within the political subdivision in which the set-up takes place.

(2) (a)  Mobile homes sold or set-up in the state shall be constructed in accordance with the state construction code applicable to a mobile home in which the mobile home was constructed at the time the mobile home was constructed.

(b)  Mobile homes set-up in the state shall be installed in accordance with the state construction code applicable to manufactured housing installation.

(c)  The authority and responsibility for the issuance of building permits for the modification of or set-up of mobile homes within a political subdivision of the state shall be with the local regulator within that political subdivision.

(d)  The inspection of modification to or the set-up of mobile homes shall be conducted and approvals given by the local regulator within the political subdivision in which the set-up takes place.

